test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-nimi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - nimi: # Noun nimi 'eng name /est /fin' - full paradigm
     nimi+N+Sg+Nom: nimi
     nimi+N+Sg+Gen: nime
     nimi+N+Sg+Par: nimme
     nimi+N+Sg+Ill: nimme
     nimi+N+Pl+Gen: nimmi
     nimi+N+Pl+Par: nimmi
     nimi+N+Pl+Ill: [nimmihe, nimmi]
     nimi+N+Pl+All: [nimile, nimmile]
